apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="piran/î__n_f">
      <e><p><l>î</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyê</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iya</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyê</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyek</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyekê</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyeke</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>î</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyên</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyan</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyên</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyin</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyinan</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyine</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyê</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyan</l><r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <pardef n="od/e__n">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eya</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ek</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ekê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eke</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyek</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyekê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyeke</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ake</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyên</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyên</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyên</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyin</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyinan</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyine</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyan</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <pardef n="ban/û__n_f">
      <e><p><l>û</l><r>û<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iwê</l><r>û<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iya</l><r>û<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>û</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iwê</l><r>û<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyek</l><r>û<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyekê</l><r>û<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyeke</l><r>û<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ike</l><r>û<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iwan</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iwên</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iwên</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iwin</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iwinan</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iwine</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iwê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ewan</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>



    <pardef n="spêd/e__n_f">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eya</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyek</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyekê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyeke</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ake</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyên</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyên</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyên</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyin</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyinan</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyine</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyê</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eyan</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <e lm="banû"><i>ban</i><par n="ban/û__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dayî"><i>day</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Sunnî"><i>Sunn</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="êzîdî"><i>êzîd</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="afrîkansî"><i>afrîkans</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="ahîze"><i>ahîz</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="aqilmendî"><i>aqilmend</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="aqlûne"><i>aqlûn</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="axazade"><i>axazad</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="aştî"><i>aşt</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="badîre"><i>badîr</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="baxleme"><i>baxlem</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="belarusî"><i>belarus</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="bermalî"><i>bermal</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="berîde"><i>berîd</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="binfermanî"><i>binferman</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="bêdengahî"><i>bêdengah</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="bêje"><i>bêj</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="bûnve"><i>bûnv</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="cerahî"><i>cerah</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="cerge"><i>cerg</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="dansatrice"><i>dansatric</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="deqîqe"><i>deqîq</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="deverparêzî"><i>deverparêz</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="dinê"><i>din</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="dînastî"><i>dînast</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="dûşîze"><i>dûşîz</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="endaze"><i>endaz</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="exrînî"><i>exrîn</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="fabrîqe"><i>fabrîq</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="firne"><i>firn</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="gelekî"><i>gelek</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="girûxane"><i>girûxan</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="harakîrî"><i>harakîr</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="herreşename"><i>herreşenam</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="hindî"><i>hind</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="kabîne"><i>kabîn</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="kanî"><i>kan</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="kolye"><i>koly</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="kornî"><i>korn</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="lazimî"><i>lazim</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="li gor dilê xwe"><i>li gor dilê xw</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="melaxme"><i>melaxm</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="mesîhîtî"><i>mesîhît</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="mide"><i>mid</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="miwahede"><i>miwahed</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="nalbendî"><i>nalbend</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="nargîle"><i>nargîl</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="nobedarî"><i>nobedar</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="nûçename"><i>nûçenam</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="penaltî"><i>penalt</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="pirêze"><i>pirêz</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="pêşewatî"><i>pêşewat</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="qedexe"><i>qedex</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="qîble"><i>qîbl</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="rawî"><i>raw</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="riwekxane"><i>riwekxan</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="rîpwarî"><i>rîpwar</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="selîqe"><i>selîq</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="serpêhatî"><i>serpêhat</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="supayî"><i>supay</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="sêwîxane"><i>sêwîxan</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="tevahî/tevayî"><i>tevahî/tevay</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="teşe"><i>teş</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="viyetnamî"><i>viyetnam</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="weşanxane"><i>weşanxan</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="xwedawendî"><i>xwedawend</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="xê"><i>x</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="zevî"><i>zev</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="çaroke"><i>çarok</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="çixarî"><i>çixar</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="îlacxane"><i>îlacxan</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="şertanê"><i>şertan</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ştexalî"><i>ştexal</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
      <e lm="çêre"><i>çêr</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekonomî"><i>ekonom</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sipî"><i>sip</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="daxuyanî"><i>daxuyan</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="serokatî"><i>serokat</i><par n="piran/î__n_f"/></e>
